District of Columbia statutes.
32-1119

Confidentiality of trade secrets.

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the Mayor or the Commission in connection with an inspection, investigation, or proceeding under this chapter which contains or which might reveal a trade secret, shall be considered confidential, except that information may be disclosed to other officers or employees when necessary to administer or enforce this chapter. The Mayor, Commission, or court shall issue orders to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 20, 35 DCR 8250

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1219.

Prior Codifications

Section effective: Section 26 (a) of D.C. Law 7-186 (§ 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.

Editor's Notes